Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 31

Streets and Other Public Improvements

7-31-101. Duty to maintain roads.

It is the duty of all incorporated municipalities, when a public highway passes through the corporation, or to any public place within the incorporated municipality, to keep the road in good repair. Nothing in this subsection (a) shall be construed to apply to any railroads or their rights-of-way.

It is the duty of the grand jury to make presentments as for misdemeanor against the mayor and governing body of any incorporated municipality that violate this section.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 72, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 1989, 1990; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3405, 3406; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1001.

Cross-References. Bonds for improvements based on assessed values of benefited properties, title 7, ch. 33, part 3.

Bridges erected by county over river through county seat towns, §54-11-220.

Highways, state funds for local aid, title 54, ch. 4, part 2.

Obstructing highway or other passageway, §39-17-307.

Penalty for misdemeanor, §§39-11-114,40-35-111.

Throwing glass or other dangerous substance on or near public highway, penalty, §39-14-502.

Attorney General Opinions. Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of statutory provisions as to political corporations or divisions that shall bear cost of establishing or maintaining highway. 2 A.L.R. 746, 123 A.L.R. 1462.

7-31-102. Duty to keep board functioning.

It is the duty of all incorporated municipalities to keep an organized governing board functioning, and if any incorporated municipalities fail so to do for six (6) consecutive months, the residents of the municipality shall be subject to work on the public roads for the space of twelve (12) months thereafter, and until a board is elected, organized and functioning.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 72, § 3; Shan., § 1991; mod. Code 1932, § 3407; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1002.

Law Reviews.

Easements in Tennessee, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 219 (1956).

7-31-103. Notice of tort action based on condition of streets.

No suit shall be brought against any municipal corporation on account of injuries received by person or property on account of the negligent condition of any street, alley, sidewalk, or highway of the municipal corporation, unless within one hundred twenty (120) days after an injury to the person or property has been inflicted, a written notice shall be served upon the mayor or manager of the municipality, stating the time and place where the injury was received and the general nature of injury inflicted. The failure to give the notice prescribed in this section, within the time set out, shall be a valid defense against any liability of the municipality that might otherwise exist on account of the defective or negligent condition of the street, alley, sidewalk, or highway; provided, that proof of registered letter by registry receipt addressed to the mayor or manager setting forth the injury and place of injury complained of shall be a complete compliance with this section.

Acts 1913, ch. 55, § 1; Shan., § 4469a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8596; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1003; Acts 1982, ch. 627, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 66; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 99; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 35.

Law Reviews.

Sovereign Immunity and The Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act (John C. Cook), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 885 (1974).

7-31-104. Establishment of streets in extension.

When the limits of an incorporated municipality are enlarged by law, the mayor and board may establish such new streets, alleys, or parks as are deemed necessary by reason of the enlargement. When the improvement is made for its public utility, it shall be done at the expense of the corporation; but should improvement be done for individual convenience, the applicants shall pay the expenses.

Code 1858, §§ 1386, 1387; Shan., §§ 1979, 1980; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3394, 3395; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1004.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 28.

7-31-105. Construction of sidewalks authorized.

It is lawful for any person owning town lots, or lands adjoining the public highways or streets in any village or unincorporated town in the state, to construct suitable sidewalks on those highways or streets along the line of the lots or lands.

Acts 1897, ch. 99, § 1; Shan., § 1679a1; Code 1932, § 2807; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1005.

Cross-References. Ramps at crosswalks required, §7-31-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 28.

7-31-106. Unlawful use of sidewalks.

When any sidewalks are constructed, every person who rides or drives a horse, team or other vehicle on the sidewalks, except for the purpose of crossing the sidewalks when necessary to do so, or who hitches any horse or other animal to any tree growing on or adjacent to such sidewalks, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1897, ch. 99, § 2; 1899, ch. 193, § 1; Shan., § 1679a2; Code 1932, § 2808; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1006; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Obstructing highway or other passageway, penalty, §39-17-307.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 28.

7-31-107. Condemnation for streets.

Wherever any municipal corporation shall seek to condemn lands to be used in establishing, widening, extending, or otherwise improving its public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards, it shall have full power to condemn the fee of the land necessary to be taken, by paying the fair cash market value of the land to be fixed in the manner provided by law where private property is taken for public use.

Acts 1923, ch. 76, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1981a1; Code 1932, § 3398; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1007.

Cross-References. Acquisition of right-of-way, lands or easements for road purposes, title 29, ch. 17, part 8.

Condemnation by city manager-commission charter city, §6-19-101.

Condemnation for school purposes, §49-6-2002.

Rights and powers of section conferred upon all municipal corporations, §7-35-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Easements in Tennessee, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 219 (1956).

7-31-108. Assessment of damages by freeholders.

When the owner of the land through which any street, alley, or park is to be extended or established requires compensation or damages for the extension or establishment, the legislative body of such municipality shall, by ordinance or resolution, appoint freeholders, not exceeding seven (7) in number, who after first being duly sworn, shall examine the premises and assess the damages or compensation, and report the damages or compensation to the mayor and aldermen or the legislative body of the municipality, which body shall cause the report to be spread upon its minutes with its action on the assessment.

Code 1858, § 1388; Shan., § 1981; Acts 1925, ch. 31, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3397; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1008.

Cross-References. Rights and powers of section conferred upon all municipal corporations, §7-35-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 63.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 921 (1954).

7-31-109. Opening of street on payment of damages.

Upon payment of the compensation or damages that have been assessed by the condemnation commission and approved by the municipal legislative body, into the office of the recorder or city clerk, for the benefit, or to the account and subject to the order of the owner of the land condemned, the administrative officer or officers of the municipality may order the owner of the land condemned to open the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards, and give the municipality possession of the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards, and fifteen (15) days after the date of the order such municipality may open and take possession of the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards.

Code 1858, § 1389; Shan., § 1982; Acts 1925, ch. 31, § 1; Code 1932, § 3399; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1009.

Cross-References. Rights and powers of section conferred upon all municipal corporations, §7-35-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 28, 30; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 56.

7-31-110. Failure to open street on condemnation.

If any owner of land condemned refuses or fails to give possession of land to the municipality or to open the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards, so condemned within fifteen (15) days after the order of the administrative officer or officers of such municipality, then such owner may be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for such failure and refusal, and each and every day of such failure and refusal is deemed a separate offense. If the owner of land condemned contests the right or legality of the condemnation, then the obligation to surrender possession to the municipality and the liability for the fine for failing so to do shall not obtain until the question of the right or legality of the condemnation shall be finally determined. Any municipal court shall have jurisdiction over such offenses. This remedy is not exclusive, but is in addition to the right of the municipality to take possession as owner of the condemned land and to open the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards.

Code 1858, § 1390; Shan., § 1983; Acts 1925, ch. 31, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3400; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1010.

Cross-References. Rights and powers of section conferred upon all municipal corporations, §7-35-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 28, 59, 61.

7-31-111. Appeal from order opening street.

Any owner aggrieved by the opening of the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards may appeal to the circuit court within twenty (20) days after the administrative officer or officers of the municipality have ordered the public streets, alleys, highways, parks, parkways, or boulevards to be opened and possession delivered; provided, that any such appeal shall not operate to prevent the municipality from taking possession of the land condemned, nor stay the opening or extension of any such street, alley or other improvement.

Code 1858, § 1391; Shan., § 1984; Acts 1925, ch. 31, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3401; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1011.

Cross-References. Rights and powers of section conferred upon all municipal corporations, §7-35-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 59, 61.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. LeClercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (1978).

7-31-112. Damage from change of grade or repair.

When any owner of real estate in any municipality sustains any damage to the owner's property by reason of any change made in the natural or established grade of any highway, street or alley, or by reason of the raising or lowering of the grades, or other acts done for the purpose of improving or repairing any highway, street or alley, the owner shall be paid all damages for the damage by such municipality, which damages may be recovered by suit brought at any time within one (1) year from the completion of or the cessation of such works, acts, or improvements; but all benefits accruing by reason of such improvements, acts, or works shall be allowed to affect, reduce, and offset the damages provided for in this section.

Acts 1891, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1893, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 1988; mod. Code 1932, § 3404; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1012.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 63, 64; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 17; 20 Tenn. Juris., Nuisances, § 33; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 20.

Law Reviews.

Sovereign Immunity and The Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act (John C. Cook), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 885 (1974).

7-31-113. Maintenance guaranties in paving contracts.

Municipalities have the power to provide in any contract made by them for paving any street, highway, alley, park, or public square, that the contractor shall guarantee to maintain and repair the street, highway, alley, park, or public square, for such time as the governing body or board of the municipality shall deem proper, the expense of which shall be included in the assessment for the construction, and no special or improvement assessment shall be affected or invalidated on account of the guaranty.

The municipalities have the authority to provide the manner and time of payment for the guaranty of maintenance or repairs.

Acts 1919, ch. 121, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1980a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3396; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1013.

7-31-114. Installation of ramps at crosswalks.

Every incorporated city and town shall install ramps at crosswalks, in both business and residential areas, when making new installations of sidewalks, curbs or gutters, or improving or replacing existing sidewalks, curbs or gutters, so as to make the transition from street to sidewalk easily negotiable for persons with disabilities in wheelchairs and for other persons who may have difficulty in making the required step up or down from curb level to street level.

“Ramps,” as used in this section, means a sloping asphalt or concrete surface, from the level of the sidewalk or curb to the level of the street at curbside, extending outward and downward from the curb to the street for such a distance, at such an angle, and at such a width as will facilitate the movement up and down such ramps of persons in wheelchairs or persons who have difficulty in stepping up or down between curb level and street level.

All such ramps shall be constructed or installed in accordance with design specifications for the ramps prepared by the department of transportation. The department shall make available to such municipalities design standards for such ramps.

Acts 1974, ch. 544, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 6-1014; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.